Mississippi, session 2026, HB4175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Charles Covington of Lee County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his convictions for the crimes of Burglary-Residential, two indictments of Arson 3rd Degree in Lee County, on February 26, 2009.  For the crime of Burglary-Residential, he was sentenced to serve seven (7) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. For the first charge for the crime of Arson 3rd Degree, he was sentenced to serve three (3) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. For the second charge for the crime of Arson 3rd Degree, he was sentenced to serve three (3) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released to Earned Release Supervision on October 18, 2011.  He was discharged on August 3, 2012. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.